Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.250

Increase in presently payable benefits for service or disability authorized.

All benefits presently payable pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060 and 41.20.080 as such RCW sections existed prior to the effective date of the amendment of such RCW sections by sections 1, 2, 3, chapter 191, Laws of 1961 to persons who retired prior to the effective date of the said 1961 amendatory act, shall be increased annually as hereafter in this section provided. The local pension board shall meet subsequent to March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the purpose of adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to the aforementioned sections. The local board shall determine the increase in the consumer price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July 1st of the year in which said board makes such determination by a dollar amount proportionate to the increase in the consumer price index: PROVIDED, That regardless of the change in the consumer price index, such increase shall be at least two percent each year such adjustment is made.

Each year effective with the July payment all benefits specified herein, shall be increased as authorized by this section. This benefit increase shall be paid monthly as part of the regular pension payment and shall be cumulative.

For the purpose of this section the term

"Consumer price index" shall mean, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 178 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 190 s 3; 1970 ex.s. c 37 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 34.]

NOTES:

Construction—1975 1st ex.s. c 178: See RCW 41.16.921.

Construction—1970 ex.s. c 37: See note following RCW 41.18.104.